District of Columbia statutes.
4-1302.09

Prosecution.

All violations of this subchapter shall be prosecuted by the Corporation Counsel of the District of Columbia or his or her designee in the name of the District of Columbia.

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title II, § 209, 24 DCR 3341
1981 Ed., § 6-2119.
1973 Ed., § 6-2119.